Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-507
Lottery, defined.

(1) Lottery shall mean a gambling scheme in which (a) participants pay or agree to pay something of value for an opportunity to win, (b) winning opportunities are represented by tickets differentiated by sequential enumeration, (c) the winners are to be determined by a random drawing of the tickets or by the method set forth in section 9-511.01 or 9-511.02, and (d) the holders of the winning tickets are to receive something of value.

(2) Except as provided in section 9-511.02, lottery shall not include (a) any raffle, (b) any gambling scheme which uses any mechanical, computer, electronic, or video gaming device which has the capability of awarding something of value, free games redeemable for something of value, or tickets or stubs redeemable for something of value, (c) any activity authorized or regulated under the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the State Lottery Act, section 9-701, or Chapter 2, article 12, or (d) any activity prohibited under Chapter 28, article 11.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 165;

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 54;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 12;

Laws 2000, LB 1086, § 20;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 27.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska Bingo Act, see section 9-201.

Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, see section 9-601.

Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-401.

Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, see section 9-301.

State Lottery Act, see section 9-801.